California statutes. Public Utilities Code
A district may impose a special tax pursuant to Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 50075) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 1 of Title 5 of the Government Code. The special taxes shall be applied uniformly to all taxpayers or all real property within the district, except that unimproved property may be taxed at a lower rate than improved property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 70, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

12892.

If, in the opinion of the board, the revenues will not be sufficient for any and all lawful purposes the board shall levy a tax for such purpose or purposes and fix the amount of money necessary to be raised therefor by taxation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

12893.

The board shall, at the time of fixing the general tax levy and in the manner provided for the general tax levy, levy and collect annually until the district’s bonds are paid, or until there is a sum in the treasury of the district set apart for that purpose to meet all sums coming due for principal and interest on the bonds, a tax sufficient to pay the annual interest on the bonds and such part of the principal thereof as becomes due before the time for fixing the next general tax levy. If the maturity of the indebtedness created by the issue of bonds begins more than one year after the date of the issuance thereof, the tax shall be levied and collected annually at the
 time and in the manner aforesaid, sufficient to pay the interest on the indebtedness as it falls due and to constitute a sinking fund for the payment of the principal on or before maturity.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

12894.

The taxes required to be levied and collected on account of interest, principal, and sinking fund of district bonds shall be in addition to all other taxes levied for district purposes, and shall be collected at the time and in the same manner as other district taxes are collected, and be used for no other purpose than the payment of the bonds and accruing interest.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

12895.

Nothing in this division prevents the issuance of revenue bonds by a district for the entire district or any special district created therein under any provision of law permitting the issuance of revenue bonds by municipal utility districts.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

12896.

The board may provide for the assessment, levy, and collection of taxes by the district, including the sale of property to the district for delinquent taxes, with penalties, interest, and cost.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

12897.

The board may elect to avail itself of the assessments made by the assessors of the counties in which the district is situated, and of the assessments made by the State Board of Equalization for those counties, and may take such assessments as the basis for district taxation and have its taxes collected by the county officials if the board declares its election so to do by resolution or ordinance and files a certified copy of the resolution or ordinance on or before the first day of August with the auditors of the counties in which the district is situated. Thereafter, each year and until otherwise provided by the board, all assessments shall be made for the district by the
 State Board of Equalization and the county assessors, and all taxes shall be collected for the district by the tax collectors, of the counties in which the district is situated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1632.)
-------------------------------------------

12898.

In such case the county auditor shall, on or before August 15th of each year, transmit to the board a statement in writing showing the total value of all property within the district, ascertained from the assessments referred to in Section 12897 as equalized.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 761.)
-------------------------------------------

12899.

In case the board elects to avail itself of the assessments referred to in Section 12897 it shall, on or before the first week day in September, or if such week day falls upon a holiday then on the first business day thereafter, fix the rate of taxes, designating the number of cents upon each hundred dollars, using as a basis the value of property transmitted to the board by the county auditors, which rate of taxation shall be sufficient to raise the amount previously fixed by the board. These acts by the board shall constitute a valid assessment of the property and a valid levy of the taxes so fixed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1632.)
-------------------------------------------

12900.

The board shall immediately after fixing the rate of taxes as above provided transmit to the county auditors of the counties in which the district is situated a statement of the rate of taxes fixed by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1632.)
-------------------------------------------

12901.

The district’s taxes so levied shall be collected at the same time and in the same manner as county taxes. When collected the net amount, ascertained as provided in this article, shall be paid to the treasurer of the district, under the general requirements and penalties provided by law for the settlement of other taxes. The district may adopt the alternative procedure of tax collection and apportionment established by Chapter 3, Part 8, Division 1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code and any amendments thereof; provided, however, that the district may thereafter abandon said alternative procedure at the end of any fiscal year of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 808.)
-------------------------------------------

12902.

Whenever any real property situate in any district which has availed itself of the provisions of Section 12897 has been sold for taxes and has been redeemed, the money paid for redemption shall be apportioned and paid to the district by the county treasurers receiving it in the proportion which the tax due to the district bears to the total tax for which the property was sold.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

12903.

The compensation to be charged by and paid to any county for the performance of services under this article shall be fixed by agreement between the board of supervisors of the county and the board. The compensation shall in no event exceed one-half of 1 percent of all money collected for the district. The compensation collected by the county shall be placed to the credit of the county salary fund.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

12904.

All taxes levied under this division are a lien on the property on which they are levied. Unless the board has by ordinance otherwise provided, the enforcement of the collection of such taxes shall be in the same manner and by the same means provided by law for the enforcement of liens for county taxes, all the provisions of law relating to the enforcement of the latter being made a part of this division, so far as applicable.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Improvement Act of 1911 [12921. - 12922.]

12921.

The Improvement Act of 1911 may be used by a district formed pursuant to this division for the construction of water facilities. In the application of said improvement act to proceedings instituted by such district, the terms used in said improvement act shall have the following meanings:

(a) “City council” and “council” mean the board of the district.

(b) “Municipality” and “city” mean district.

(c) “Clerk” and “city clerk” mean secretary of the board.

(d) “Superintendent of streets,” “street superintendent” and “city engineer” mean the engineer appointed by the district to perform the engineering work for the assessment district.

(e) “Tax collector” means county tax collector.

(f) “Treasurer” and “city treasurer” mean the person or officer who has charge of and makes payment of the funds of the district.

(g) “Right-of-way” shall mean any parcel of land over which the district shall have an easement for the purpose of constructing or maintaining water or sewer lines.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 210.)
-------------------------------------------

12922.

The powers and duties conferred by the Improvement Act of 1911 on boards, officers and agents of cities shall be exercised by the respective boards, officers and agents of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1206.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Municipal Improvement Act of 1913 [13010. - 13010.]

13010.

The Municipal Improvement Act of 1913 may be used by a district formed pursuant to this division for any purpose or purposes which a district may carry out.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 210.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. Irrigation Standby or Immediate Availability Charge [13021. - 13024.]

13021.

This article shall apply only to the ownership, operation, control, or use by a district of a system for the distribution of irrigation water and shall not affect, but shall be in addition to, the right of the board of directors of the district to fix rates and charges, and to supervise and regulate every utility owned and operated by the district pursuant to this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 174.)
-------------------------------------------

13022.

(a) A district which acquires, constructs, owns, operates, controls, or uses works for supplying its inhabitants and lands within the district with irrigation water, may, pursuant to the notice, protest, and hearing procedures in Section 53753 of the Government Code, fix by resolution on or before the first day of July of each year a water standby or immediate availability charge on all land within its boundaries to which water is made available by the district for irrigation purposes, whether the water is actually used or not. Such charge
 shall not apply to lands permanently dedicated exclusively to transportation of persons or property.

(b) The board of directors of a district which fixes such a standby charge may establish schedules varying the charges in different areas within a district. The board of directors may not, however, fix an annual standby charge at a rate in excess of ten dollars ($10) per acre or portion thereof, unless the standby charge is imposed pursuant to the Uniform Standby Charge Procedures Act (Chapter 12.4 (commencing with Section 54984) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code).

(c) If the procedures set forth in this section as it read at the time a standby charge was established were followed, the district’s board may, by resolution, continue the charge pursuant to this section in successive years at the same rate. If new, increased, or extended assessments are
 proposed, the board shall comply with the notice, protest, and hearing procedures in Section 53753 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 27, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

13023.

(a) Any district levying a standby charge, which has elected under Section 12897 to use county and state assessment and tax collection procedures, shall, on or before the first day of August of each year, furnish in writing to the county auditor of each affected county a description of each parcel of land within the district upon which a standby charge has been levied for the current fiscal year, together with the amount of standby charge fixed by the district on each parcel of land.

(b) All county officers charged with the duty of collecting taxes shall collect district standby charges with
 the regular tax payments to the county. Such charges shall be collected in the same form and manner as county taxes are collected and shall be paid to the district. Charges fixed by the district shall be a lien on all the property benefited thereby. Liens for such charges shall be of the same force and effect as other liens for taxes, and their collection may be enforced by the same means as provided for the enforcement of liens for state and county taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 174.)
-------------------------------------------

13024.

Any funds derived from the standby charges levied pursuant to this article may be used by the district for all purposes which a district is authorized to expend funds insofar as such purposes relate to the acquisition of a water supply or the acquisition, construction, operation, control, or use of works for supplying land within the district with irrigation water.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 174.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6.5. Electric System Improvements [13071. - 13193.]



  ARTICLE 1. Application [13071. - 13073.]

13071.

This chapter is complete authority for the issuance of bonds hereunder, and no action or proceeding not required by this chapter shall be necessary for the valid authorization and issuance of such bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2237.)
-------------------------------------------

13072.

Unless otherwise clearly indicated by the context, all of the provisions of this chapter shall be understood as relating only to bonds issued under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2237.)
-------------------------------------------

13073.

This chapter shall apply only to districts which have owned and operated an electric distribution system for at least 10 years and which have a population of 250,000 or more.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2237.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [13081. - 13085.]

13081.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the provisions of this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2237.)
-------------------------------------------

13082.

“Bonds” includes the meaning of “notes, certificates and other evidences of indebtedness” and in every case refers only to bonds issued under this chapter, whether so specified or not.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2237.)
-------------------------------------------

13083.

“Refund” includes the meaning of “extend” and “renew.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2237.)
-------------------------------------------

13084.

“Assented to by the voters” means that the proposition indicated by the context has been submitted to the voters of the district, and has been assented to by a majority of those voters who voted upon that proposition at the election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2237.)
-------------------------------------------

13085.

“Payments on principal” means payments on account of the principal of bonds, whether upon maturity or by payments into a sinking fund on account of principal, and includes premiums required to be paid on the mandatory redemption of sinking fund bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2237.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. General Authorization [13091. - 13096.]

13091.

A district may borrow money from time to time for the purpose of constructing, reconstructing, replacing, extending or improving its system for supplying the district and its inhabitants with electric energy, and may issue and sell bonds to evidence the indebtedness created by such borrowing. No such money may be used:

(1) For constructing or improving works located outside the district boundaries which exist on the date this Chapter 6.5 is enacted.

(2) For acquiring any property owned by a public utility.

(3) For constructing or improving works for generating electricity.

(4) For constructing or improving works used, or to be used, in whole or in part either for the receipt, transmission and delivery of electric energy for any supplier of electric power or for the exchange of electric power with any person or entity. This provision shall not prevent the district from using such money for the purposes set forth in the initial sentence of this section.

Such bonds shall not be issued for a term in excess of 20 years after the date of such bonds; provided, that this sentence shall not limit the power of a district to refund such bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1962, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

13092.

A district may also refund from time to time, whether at or prior to maturity, any outstanding indebtedness evidenced by its bonds, and may issue, and sell or exchange, bonds so to refund such indebtedness. Refunding bonds which are to be sold may be issued and sold at such time in advance of the time at which the bonds to be redeemed or paid out of the proceeds of such refunding bonds are to be so redeemed or paid as the board may determine.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2237.)
-------------------------------------------

13093.

Whenever a district exercises the power to borrow money pursuant to this chapter the board may authorize the issuance of bonds in any amount which, when added to the aggregate amount of bonds of the district issued under this chapter and outstanding at the time of the acceptance of a proposal for the purchase of the bonds so authorized and payable out of the revenues out of which the bonds so authorized are to be payable shall not exceed the amount of the earned surplus derived from the operation of the electric system to which those revenues pertain, as of the end of the last fiscal year which ended not less than four months prior to the making of the finding and
 determination provided for in Section 13161. The aggregate amount of bonds issued under this chapter shall not exceed in face value the sum of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) in any one calendar year. The term “earned surplus” whenever used in this chapter means the excess of revenues from the inception of operation of the electric system over related expenses thereof, plus accumulated price-level depreciation, plus or minus any additional amounts credited to or charged against customers’ equity employed in the business of the electric system, as determined in accordance with the then current accounting practice of the district. The term “accumulated price-level depreciation” as used in this section means the accumulated additional amounts by which depreciation based on the cost of depreciable property adjusted to reflect current price levels exceeds depreciation computed on cost.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1962, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

13094.

The limitations prescribed in Section 13093 shall not be applicable to the issuance of any refunding bonds pursuant to this chapter, and the amount of any issue of such refunding bonds may equal, but shall not exceed, the amount required for the payment or redemption of the bonds to be refunded thereby, including the premiums, if any, due upon such redemption, but excluding any interest due upon such redemption.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2237.)
-------------------------------------------

13095.

Any bond for the payment and discharge of which, upon maturity or upon redemption prior to maturity, provision has been made through the setting apart in a reserve fund or special trust account created pursuant to this chapter to insure the payment thereof, of moneys sufficient for that purpose, or through the irrevocable segregation for that purpose, in some sinking fund or other fund or trust account, of moneys sufficient therefor, shall be deemed to be no longer outstanding within the meaning of any provision of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2237.)
-------------------------------------------

13096.

The board shall have power to determine all the terms and conditions of the issuance and sale of bonds pursuant to this chapter, excepting only as such power is limited by express provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2237.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Proceedings for Issuance [13101. - 13107.]

13101.

Whenever a district proposes to exercise the power to borrow money, or to refund indebtedness, pursuant to this chapter, the board shall adopt a preliminary resolution declaring its intention to authorize the issuance of bonds for such purpose, which resolution shall specify all of the following:

(1) The purpose for which the proposed bonds are to be issued.

(2) The maximum principal amount of the bonds proposed to be issued in the then current calendar year.

(3) The maximum term
 for which any of said bonds are to run.

(4) The maximum rate of interest to be payable upon such bonds.

(5) The maximum premium, if any, to be payable on the redemption of any such bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1962, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

13103.

When bonds are issued under this chapter, the preliminary resolution of the board adopted pursuant to this article shall take effect upon its adoption by the board subject to the right of referendum herein provided for.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1962, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

13104.

Upon any such resolution taking effect subject to the right of referendum, pursuant to this article, the board shall cause the same to be published in the manner provided for the publication of notices. At any time within 60 days after the date of the second such publication a referendary petition, signed by voters in number equal to at least 3 percent of the total vote cast, as defined in Section 11507, demanding the submission of such resolution to a vote of the voters of the district for their assent to the issuance of the proposed bonds, may be filed with the secretary. Upon presentation to the secretary of a referendary petition, the resolution which is the subject
 thereof shall be of no effect unless and until it has been assented to by the voters.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2237.)
-------------------------------------------

13105.

If no such referendary petition is presented within the aforesaid period of 60 days, then upon the expiration of said period, or if the proposition of issuing the bonds specified in the resolution of the board adopted pursuant to this article has been assented to by the voters, whether upon referendum or pursuant to any other provisions of this chapter, then upon such proposition having been so assented to, the resolution shall take full and final effect, and the board may proceed in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and issue bonds within the terms of the resolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2237.)
-------------------------------------------

13106.

The provisions of any resolution constituting a part of the proceedings for the issuance of any bonds under this chapter, when so declared by its terms, or by the terms of any other such resolution, shall constitute a contract between the district and the holders of such bonds, and the provisions thereof shall be enforceable by mandamus or any other appropriate suit, action or proceeding at law or in equity in any court of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2237.)
-------------------------------------------

13107.

The board at any time may adopt a resolution providing for submission to the voters of the district of the proposition of assenting to any proposed action of the board in any case where such assent is required or permitted by the terms of this chapter, or in any case where the board may deem such submission to be desirable. Such resolution may provide for such submission at any specified regular district election, or at any special election. Such resolution and such election shall, except to the extent otherwise provided in this chapter, conform to the requirements of Article 1, Chapter 7, of this division. The board shall do, or cause to be done, any and all things necessary
 to make such submission at the election indicated by its resolution and to determine and certify the result thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2237.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Sources of Payment [13111. - 13112.]

13111.

All bonds issued by a district pursuant to this chapter shall be, and shall recite upon their face that they are, payable both as to principal and interest, and as to any premiums upon the redemption thereof, out of the revenues pertaining to the electric system on account of which the indebtedness evidenced by such bonds was created, and not out of any other fund or moneys of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2237.)
-------------------------------------------

13112.

The provisions of this article shall not preclude any of the following:

(1) The payment of any such principal, interest or premiums through appropriate reserve funds or special trust accounts, established as hereinafter in this article provided.

(2) The payment of interest on or principal of bonds of any such issue out of sums received as premiums or accrued interest on the sale of that issue.

(3) The payment of any such principal or premiums out of the proceeds of the sale of
 refunding bonds issued for that purpose.

(4) The payment out of the proceeds of any bonds of the whole or a part of the interest accruing on said bonds during the period of the performance of work to be paid for out of such proceeds.

(5) The payment of any such principal, interest or premiums by the purchasers of any such bonds, or by any entity, public or private, other than the district, in any case where any such purchaser or entity may have guaranteed such payment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2237.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Reserve Funds [13121. - 13124.]

13121.

In connection with the exercise of the power to borrow money, to issue bonds, and to refund indebtedness, pursuant to this chapter, the board may, from time to time, establish and maintain a reserve fund or funds in the district treasury, or a special trust account or accounts with an agent or agents designated by the board as a sinking fund or otherwise, to insure the payment, when due or payable, whether at maturity or upon redemption, of the principal of, and interest on, bonds issued as aforesaid, including premiums, if any, due upon the redemption of any thereof, or for any of said purposes. Money in any such reserve fund may be used for the purchase of bonds of the
 issue in connection with which it was established, for cancellation and retirement pursuant to any mandatory requirement of the redemption of sinking fund bonds. Each such fund or account shall be established and maintained out of the revenues pertaining to the electric system on account of which such power is exercised or out of any moneys which under the terms of this article are applicable to the purpose, through transfers or payments made at such times and in such amounts as the board may direct.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2237.)
-------------------------------------------

13122.

Money set aside and placed in any such reserve fund or special trust account shall remain therein until from time to time expended for the purposes thereof, and shall not be used for any other purpose whatsoever, except for temporary investment thereof as provided in this chapter; provided, however,

(1) That money may be paid or transferred from any such fund or account in furtherance of the purpose of its establishment, to any other such fund or account established for a like purpose in connection with the same issue of bonds, to such extent as may be required or permitted under the terms of the resolution
 authorizing that issue; and

(2) That all money remaining in any such fund or account in excess of the amount required to make provision for the payment in full of the principal of, and interest on, the bonds with respect to which it was established, including premiums, if any, due upon the redemption of any thereof, may be returned and transferred to the revenue fund out of which such reserve fund was established.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2237.)
-------------------------------------------

13123.

Money in any such reserve fund shall be drawn therefrom only upon demands authenticated by the signature of the accountant of the district; provided, however, that the board may, in its discretion, direct and authorize the payment from such reserve fund, by the treasurer, without such authenticated demand, (i) of bonds of the issue in connection with which such reserve fund is so established when due upon maturity or call, or of coupons pertaining to bonds of such issue when due, but only upon presentation and surrender of such bonds or coupons, (ii) of interest upon registered bonds of such issue when due, or (iii) of premiums, if any, due upon the redemption of any such bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2237.)
-------------------------------------------

13124.

Money in any such special trust account shall be drawn therefrom only in accordance with directions given or authorized by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2237.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Obligation to Bondholders [13131. - 13136.]

13131.

So long as any bonds of the district are outstanding and unpaid, or so long as provision has not been made for the full payment and discharge of all such outstanding bonds, upon maturity, or upon redemption prior to maturity, through the setting apart in a reserve fund or special trust account created pursuant to this article to insure the payment thereof, of money sufficient for that purpose, or through other irrevocable allocation to that purpose of money sufficient therefor all provisions of this article shall be complied with.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2237.)
-------------------------------------------

13132.

The board shall fix rates for service from the electric system to which the indebtedness pertains, and collect charges for such service, such as to provide revenues at least sufficient in the aggregate to pay, as the same shall become due, the principal and interest on all such bonds so outstanding payable out of those revenues, including premiums, if any, due upon the redemption of any thereof, in addition to paying, as the same shall become due, the necessary expenses of operating and maintaining such system, and all other obligations and indebtedness payable out of those revenues.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2237.)
-------------------------------------------

13133.

Bonds issued under this chapter shall be issued without any priority with respect to payment of principal or interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2237.)
-------------------------------------------

13134.

The electric system of the district to which the indebtedness pertains shall not be sold or otherwise disposed of, as a whole or substantially as a whole, unless such sale or other disposition be so arranged as to provide for a continuance of payments into a fund sufficient in amount to permit payment therefrom of principal of, and interest on, and premiums, if any, due upon the redemption of, all bonds issued under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2237.)
-------------------------------------------

13135.

No indebtedness payable out of revenues shall be created in contravention of the provisions of any resolutions heretofore adopted by the board in connection with the authorization of any bonds payable out of revenues.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2237.)
-------------------------------------------

13136.

Anything in this article to the contrary notwithstanding, the board, in any resolution constituting a part of the proceedings for the issuance of any issue of bonds under this chapter may determine that the holders of the bonds of that issue are not to be entitled to the benefits of or to enforce any or all of the provisions of this article, and to that end the board, in such resolution, shall specify the provisions of this article to the benefits of which the holders of the bonds of that issue shall be entitled; and the holders of the bonds of that issue shall not be entitled to the benefits of or to enforce any of the provisions of this article not so
 specified.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2237.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Consents of Bondholders [13141. - 13142.]

13141.

The board may provide in the resolution authorizing the issue of any bonds under this chapter that any act consented to by the holders of 60 percent in aggregate principal amount of the outstanding bonds of any issue of bonds issued under this chapter, pursuant to provisions for such consents contained in any resolution of the board constituting a part of the proceedings for the issuance of such bonds, shall not, as to the bonds of that issue, be deemed an infringement of any of the provisions of Article 7 of this chapter, or of any covenant made pursuant thereto, whatever the character of such act may be.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2237.)
-------------------------------------------

13142.

The board may provide in the resolution authorizing the issue of any bonds under this chapter the terms and conditions upon which any provision of any resolution of the board constituting a part of the proceedings for the issuance of such bonds, or any provision of such bonds or coupons appurtenant thereto, may be modified if consented to by the holders of any percentage, specified in such resolution authorizing the issue of such bonds, of the aggregate principal amount of the outstanding bonds of such issue.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2237.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Form and Content [13151. - 13152.]

13151.

Without limiting in any way the generality of its power, the board is expressly authorized, in its discretion, to provide, in connection with any issue of bonds under this chapter all the matters contained in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2237.)
-------------------------------------------

13151.1.

The board may provide for such bonds being in such amounts, of such denominations, payable at such times, and in such form as the board may determine.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2237.)
-------------------------------------------

13151.2.

The board may provide for such bonds being negotiable or nonnegotiable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2237.)
-------------------------------------------

13151.3.

The board may provide for such bonds and the interest thereon, and premiums, if any, due upon the redemption of any thereof, being payable or collectible at any place or places, within or without the State of California, and without presentation and approval of demands.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2237.)
-------------------------------------------

13151.4.

The board may provide for such bonds being payable to bearer or only to the registered holder, either as to principal alone, or as to both principal and interest; for such bonds being with or without coupons; for such bonds being nonregisterable, or registerable, either as to principal alone, or as to both principal and interest; for such bonds being exchangeable or nonexchangeable, convertible or nonconvertible; and for the reissuance of bonds or coupons which have been surrendered and preserved, or for the issuance of new bonds or coupons in the place of bonds or coupons which have been surrendered and canceled, wherever appropriate as incident to the discharge of any
 bond from registration, or to any exchange or conversion of any bond; all on such terms and conditions, and at such place or places, within or without the State of California, as the board may determine.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2237.)
-------------------------------------------

13151.5.

The board may provide for such bonds being redeemable, either at the option of the district, or in the operation of any sinking fund provided for the issue, at such price or prices and in such manner as the board may determine, whether or not involving the payment of a premium upon such redemption; provided, that no bond shall be subject to redemption unless such bond at the time of its issue states on its face that it is redeemable at the option of the district or by the operation of a sinking fund for bonds of that issue, as the case may be.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2237.)
-------------------------------------------

13151.6.

The board may provide for the issuance by the district of a duplicate, in the manner and on such terms and conditions as the board may determine, in the event any bond, temporary bond, coupon or interim receipt of any such issue is lost, destroyed or mutilated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2237.)
-------------------------------------------

13151.7.

The board may provide for the appointment and payment of fiscal, paying, sinking fund or other agents, or of trustees or registrars.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2237.)
-------------------------------------------

13151.8.

The board may provide for the appointment of the treasurer of the district to act as such fiscal, paying, sinking fund or other agent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2237.)
-------------------------------------------

13151.9.

The board may provide for the custody by the district of bonds and coupons, whether pending delivery or after purchase or surrender; for the delivery of bonds and coupons by the district to the purchaser thereof; for the receipt by the district of the proceeds of the sale and for the depositing of such proceeds in the proper fund or funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2237.)
-------------------------------------------

13151.10.

The board may provide for the sale of any such bonds upon such terms and conditions as the board in its discretion may determine at public sale. Bonds may be sold by the board below the par or face value thereof, at a discount not to exceed 6 percent of par value; provided further, that in the case of refunding bonds the board may provide for the refunding being made, in whole or in part, by the exchange of such refunding bonds for the bonds to be refunded. Before selling the bonds, or any part thereof, the board shall give notice not less than 10 days prior to the date of sale by publication in a newspaper of general circulation circulating in the district inviting
 sealed bids in such manner as the board shall prescribe. If satisfactory bids are received, the bonds offered for sale shall be awarded to the highest responsible bidder. If no bids are received, or if the board determines that the bids received are not satisfactory as to price or responsibility of the bidders, the board may reject all bids received, if any, and either readvertise or sell the bonds at private sale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 245.)
-------------------------------------------

13151.11.

The board may provide for the issuance of interim receipts or of temporary bonds, in such form as the board may prescribe, pending the issuance of definitive bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2237.)
-------------------------------------------

13151.12.

The board may provide for any signatures to such bonds and to any coupons thereto attached, and to any interim receipts and temporary bonds, being by facsimile.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2237.)